Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202184-1415
Open Meetings Act; requirements; waiver; validity of action.

No motion, resolution, rule, regulation, ordinance, or formal action made, adopted, passed, or taken at a meeting as defined in section 84-1409 of a public body as defined in such section shall be invalidated because such motion, resolution, rule, regulation, ordinance, or formal action was made, adopted, passed, or taken at a meeting or meetings on or after March 17, 2020, and on or before April 30, 2021, pursuant to a Governor's Executive Order which waived certain requirements of the Open Meetings Act.

Laws 2021, LB83, § 15.
April 22, 2021
Open Meetings Act, see section 84-1407.